Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,130.04
Commercial driver safety course instructors; requirements; driver safety course; requirements.

Commercial driver safety course instructors shall possess competence as outlined in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Department of Motor Vehicles. Instructors who teach the department-approved driver safety course in a public school or institution and possess competence as outlined in a driver's education endorsement shall be eligible to sign a form prescribed by the department or electronically submit test results to the department showing successful completion of the driver safety course. Each public school or institution offering a department-approved driver safety course shall be required to obtain a certificate and pay the fee pursuant to section 60-4,130.05.

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 15;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 85;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 57.